Mississippi, session 2026, HB1004.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Comprehensive Reproductive Health and Education Act." SECTION 2.  The following words shall have the meanings described herein as follows: (a) "Comprehensive Education" means and refers to age-appropriate, medically accurate, and inclusive instruction on reproductive health, contraception, STD/STI prevention, and healthy relationships. (b)  "Medical Professional" means and includes licensed physicians, nurses, and healthcare practitioners with expertise in sexual health. (c)  "Trained Advocate" means and refers to an individual certified in delivering reproductive health education, including STD/STI prevention and counseling. (d)  "Permission Slip" means a signed document from a parent or guardian granting consent for a student to participate in the educational program. SECTION 3. (1)  There is hereby created a program entitled the Comprehensive Reproductive Health and Education program to be administered by the State Department of Education, for purposes entering into partnership with the Department of Health, to oversee the development and distribution of the curriculum and training programs described in this act. (2)  School districts are authorized to opt in to this program and those so doing shall receive guidance, support, and materials from the Department of Education to ensure compliance with this act.  School districts that opt in must ensure the program aligns with local policies and notify parents/guardians of the opportunity. (3)  The program shall be made available to any student age sixteen (16) years of age or older currently enrolled in high school provided that: (a)  The student's parent or guardian signed a permission slip for inclusion in the program; and (b)  No student is required to participate and a student's failure to participate and does not adversely affect a student's academic standing. (4)  Instruction under the program shall be: (a)  Conducted by medical professionals or trained advocates with expertise in reproductive health and STD/STI education; and (b)  Conducted by medical professionals who have completed certified training on inclusive and culturally sensitive teaching practices. (5)  (a)  The program's curriculum shall provide accurate evidence-based information, which at a minimum, addresses the following components: (i)  Reproductive anatomy and health; (ii)  Contraception methods and their effectiveness; (iii)  Prevention and treatment of STDs/STIs; and (iv)  Consent, healthy relationships, and communication skills. (b)  The curriculum must be inclusive and respectful of diverse cultural, religious, and personal values. (c)  Students must be provided with access to reliable resources, including referrals to local health clinics, counselors, or community organizations for further support. SECTION 4.  Funding for the program will be allocated through state budget, federal grants, or public-private partnerships. SECTION 5.  (1) The State Department of Education will conduct an annual review of the program to assess its effectiveness, including participation rates and feedback from students and parents. (2)  A report on the program's outcomes and recommendations for improvement shall be submitted to the State Legislature by August 2029. SECTION 6.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.